Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska12-1207
Discovery of remains or goods; county attorney; duties.

Upon notification pursuant to section 12-1206, the county attorney shall determine whether the human skeletal remains are associated with or suspected of association with any crime and, if a determination of prosecutable criminal activity is made, shall retain custody of the remains in accordance with routine procedures until such time as the remains may be reburied in accordance with the Unmarked Human Burial Sites and Skeletal Remains Protection Act.

Laws 1989, LB 340, § 7.